California, session 20252026, AB965.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21212.5 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:21212.5. (a) A person shall not sell a class 3 electric bicycle to a person under 16 years of age.(b) A violation of this section is an infraction and shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred and fifty dollars ($250).SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.